Illinois, session 104th, SB3113.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Oil and Gas Act is amended by 5changing Sections 1, 6, 8a, 8e, 14, and 26 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 725/1)  (from Ch. 96 1/2, par. 5401)7    Sec. 1. Unless the context otherwise requires, the words 8defined in this Section have the following meanings as used in 9this Act.10    "Department" means the Department of Natural Resources.11    "Director" means the Director of Natural Resources.12    "Drilling unit" means the surface area allocated by an 13order or rule of the Department to the drilling of a single 14well for the production of oil or gas from an individual pool.15    "Enhanced recovery method" means any method used in an 16effort to recover hydrocarbons from a pool by the injection of 17fluids, gases, or other substances to maintain, restore, or 18augment natural reservoir energy, or by introducing immiscible 19or miscible gases, chemicals, or other substances, or heat, or 20by in-situ combustion, or by any combination thereof.21    "Field" means the same general surface area that is 22underlaid or appears to be underlaid by one or more pools.23    "Fresh water" means surface and subsurface water in its   SB3113 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 19645 BAB 33094 b1natural state useful as drinking water for human consumption, 2domestic livestock, irrigation, industrial, municipal, and 3recreational purposes, and that will support aquatic life and 4contains less than 10,000 ppm of total dissolved solids.5    "Person" means any natural person, corporation, 6association, partnership, governmental agency or other legal 7entity, receiver, trustee, guardian, executor, administrator, 8fiduciary or representative of any kind.9    "Oil" means natural crude oil or petroleum and other 10hydrocarbons, regardless of gravity, which are produced at the 11well in liquid form by ordinary production methods or by the 12use of an oil and gas separator and which are not the result of 13condensation of gas after it leaves the underground reservoir.14    "Gas" means all natural gas, including casinghead gas, and 15all other natural hydrocarbons not defined above as oil.16    "Mineral owner's royalty" means the share of oil and gas 17production reserved in an oil and gas lease, free of all costs 18by an owner of the minerals, whether denominated royalty or 19overriding royalty.20    "Mining Board" means the State Mining Board in the 21Department of Natural Resources Office of Mines and Minerals.22    "Oil" means natural crude oil or petroleum and other 23hydrocarbons, regardless of gravity, which are produced at the 24well in liquid form by ordinary production methods or by the 25use of an oil and gas separator, which are not the result of 26condensation of gas after it leaves the underground reservoir.  SB3113 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 19645 BAB 33094 b1    "Orphan well" means a well for which: (1) no fee 2assessment under Section 19.7 of this Act has been paid or no 3other bond coverage has been provided for 2 consecutive years; 4(2) no oil or gas has been produced from the well or from the 5lease or unit on which the well is located for 2 consecutive 6years; and (3) no permittee or owner can be identified or 7located by the Department. "Orphan well" includes a well that 8has been drilled for purposes other than those for which a 9permit is required under this Act if the well is a conduit for 10oil or salt water intrusions into fresh water zones or onto the 11surface, which may be caused by oil and gas operations.12    "Owner" means the person who has the right to drill into 13and produce from any pool and to appropriate the production 14either for the person or for the person and another, others, or 15solely for others, excluding the mineral owner's royalty, if 16the right to drill and produce has been granted under an oil 17and gas lease. "Owner" includes a person granted the right to 18drill and operate an injection (Class II UIC) well independent 19of the right to drill for and produce oil or gas. When the 20right to drill, produce, and appropriate production is held by 21more than one person, then all persons holding these rights 22may designate the owner by a written operating agreement or 23similar written agreement. In the absence of such an 24agreement, and subject to the provisions of Sections 22.2 and 2523.1 through 23.16 of this Act, the owner shall be the person 26designated in writing by a majority of the persons in interest   SB3113 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 19645 BAB 33094 b1holding these rights.2    "Permit" means the Department's written authorization 3allowing a well to be drilled, deepened, converted, or 4operated by an owner.5    "Permittee" means the owner holding or required to hold 6the permit, and who is also responsible for paying assessments 7in accordance with Section 19.7 of this Act, and, where 8applicable, executing and filing the bond associated with the 9well as principal, and who is responsible for compliance with 10all statutory and regulatory requirements pertaining to the 11well.12    When the right and responsibility for operating a well is 13vested in a receiver or trustee appointed by a court of 14competent jurisdiction, the permit shall be issued to the 15receiver or trustee.16    "Person" means any natural person, corporation, 17association, partnership, governmental agency, including any 18other legal entity, receiver, trustee, guardian, executor, 19administrator, fiduciary, or representative of any kind.20    "Pool" means a natural, underground reservoir containing 21in whole or in part, a natural accumulation of oil or gas, or 22both. Each productive zone or stratum of a general structure, 23which is completely separated from any other zone or stratum 24in the structure, is deemed a separate "pool" as used herein.25    "Produced water" means water, regardless of chloride and 26total dissolved solids content that is produced in conjunction   SB3113 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 19645 BAB 33094 b1with oil and natural gas production or natural gas storage 2operations.3    "Temporary abandonment status" means a well that has 4received an authorization for temporary abandonment status 5from the Department.6    "Vacuum" means pressure that is reduced below the pressure 7of the atmosphere. 8    "Field" means the same general surface area which is 9underlaid or appears to be underlaid by one or more pools.10    "Permit" means the Department's written authorization 11allowing a well to be drilled, deepened, converted, or 12operated by an owner.13    "Permittee" means the owner holding or required to hold 14the permit, and who is also responsible for paying assessments 15in accordance with Section 19.7 of this Act and, where 16applicable, executing and filing the bond associated with the 17well as principal and who is responsible for compliance with 18all statutory and regulatory requirements pertaining to the 19well.20    When the right and responsibility for operating a well is 21vested in a receiver or trustee appointed by a court of 22competent jurisdiction, the permit shall be issued to the 23receiver or trustee.24    "Orphan Well" means a well for which: (1) no fee 25assessment under Section 19.7 of this Act has been paid or no 26other bond coverage has been provided for 2 consecutive years;   SB3113 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 19645 BAB 33094 b1(2) no oil or gas has been produced from the well or from the 2lease or unit on which the well is located for 2 consecutive 3years; and (3) no permittee or owner can be identified or 4located by the Department. Orphaned wells include wells that 5may have been drilled for purposes other than those for which a 6permit is required under this Act if the well is a conduit for 7oil or salt water intrusions into fresh water zones or onto the 8surface which may be caused by oil and gas operations.9    "Owner" means the person who has the right to drill into 10and produce from any pool, and to appropriate the production 11either for the person or for the person and another, or others, 12or solely for others, excluding the mineral owner's royalty if 13the right to drill and produce has been granted under an oil 14and gas lease. An owner may also be a person granted the right 15to drill and operate an injection (Class II UIC) well 16independent of the right to drill for and produce oil or gas. 17When the right to drill, produce, and appropriate production 18is held by more than one person, then all persons holding these 19rights may designate the owner by a written operating 20agreement or similar written agreement. In the absence of such 21an agreement, and subject to the provisions of Sections 22.2 22and 23.1 through 23.16 of this Act, the owner shall be the 23person designated in writing by a majority in interest of the 24persons holding these rights.25    "Department" means the Department of Natural Resources.26    "Director" means the Director of Natural Resources.  SB3113 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 19645 BAB 33094 b1    "Mining Board" means the State Mining Board in the 2Department of Natural Resources, Office of Mines and Minerals.3    "Mineral Owner's Royalty" means the share of oil and gas 4production reserved in an oil and gas lease free of all costs 5by an owner of the minerals whether denominated royalty or 6overriding royalty.7    "Waste" means "physical waste" as that term is generally 8understood in the oil and gas industry, and further includes:9        (1) the locating, drilling, and producing of any oil 10    or gas well or wells drilled contrary to the valid order, 11    rules and regulations adopted by the Department under the 12    provisions of this Act;13        (2) permitting the migration of oil, gas, or water 14    from the stratum in which it is found, into other strata, 15    thereby ultimately resulting in the loss of recoverable 16    oil, gas or both;17        (3) the drowning with water of any stratum or part 18    thereof capable of producing oil or gas, except for 19    secondary recovery purposes;20        (4) the unreasonable damage to underground, fresh or 21    mineral water supply, workable coal seams, or other 22    mineral deposits in the operations for the discovery, 23    development, production, or handling of oil and gas;24        (5) the unnecessary or excessive surface loss or 25    destruction of oil or gas resulting from evaporation, 26    seepage, leakage or fire, especially such loss or   SB3113 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 19645 BAB 33094 b1    destruction incident to or resulting from the escape of 2    gas into the open air in excessive or unreasonable 3    amounts, provided, however, it shall not be unlawful for 4    the operator or owner of any well producing both oil and 5    gas to burn such gas in flares when such gas is, under the 6    other provisions of this Act, lawfully produced, and where 7    there is no market at the well for such escaping gas; and 8    where the same is used for the extraction of casinghead 9    gas, it shall not be unlawful for the operator of the plant 10    after the process of extraction is completed, to burn such 11    residue in flares when there is no market at such plant for 12    such residue gas;13        (6) permitting unnecessary fire hazards; and 14        (7) permitting unnecessary damage to or destruction of 15    the surface, soil, animal, fish or aquatic life or 16    property from oil or gas operations.17    "Drilling Unit" means the surface area allocated by an 18order or regulation of the Department to the drilling of a 19single well for the production of oil or gas from an individual 20pool.21    "Enhanced Recovery Method" means any method used in an 22effort to recover hydrocarbons from a pool by injection of 23fluids, gases or other substances to maintain, restore or 24augment natural reservoir energy, or by introducing immiscible 25or miscible gases, chemicals, other substances or heat or by 26in-situ combustion, or by any combination thereof.  SB3113 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 19645 BAB 33094 b1    "Well-Site Equipment" means any production-related 2equipment or materials specific to the well, including motors, 3pumps, pump jacks, tanks, tank batteries, separators, 4compressors, casing, tubing, and rods.5    "Temporary abandonment status" means a well that has 6received an authorization for temporary abandonment status 7from the Department. 8(Source: P.A. 102-1017, eff. 1-1-23.) 9    (225 ILCS 725/6)  (from Ch. 96 1/2, par. 5409)10    Sec. 6. The Department shall have the authority to conduct 11hearings and to make such reasonable rules as may be necessary 12from time to time in the proper administration and enforcement 13of this Act, including the adoption of rules and the holding of 14hearings for the following purposes:15        (1) To require the drilling, casing and plugging of 16    wells to be done in such a manner as to prevent the 17    migration of oil or gas from one stratum to another; to 18    prevent the intrusion of water into oil, gas or coal 19    strata; to prevent the pollution of fresh water supplies 20    by oil, gas or salt water.21        (2) To require the person desiring or proposing to 22    drill, deepen or convert any well for the exploration or 23    production of oil or gas, for injection or water supply in 24    connection with enhanced recovery projects, for the 25    disposal of salt water, brine, or other oil or gas field   SB3113 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 19645 BAB 33094 b1    wastes, or for input, withdrawal, or observation in 2    connection with the storage of natural gas or other liquid 3    or gaseous hydrocarbons before commencing the drilling, 4    deepening or conversion of any such well, to make 5    application to the Department upon such form as the 6    Department may prescribe and to comply with the provisions 7    of this Section. The drilling, deepening or conversion of 8    any well is hereby prohibited until such application is 9    made and the applicant is issued a permit therefor as 10    provided by this Act. Each application for a well permit 11    shall include the following: (A) The exact location of the 12    well, (B) the name and address of the manager, operator, 13    contractor, driller, or any other person responsible for 14    the conduct of drilling operations, (C) the proposed depth 15    of the well, (D) lease ownership information, and (E) such 16    other relevant information as the Department may deem 17    necessary or convenient to effectuate the purposes of this 18    Act.19        (2.5) Additionally, for each applicant who has not 20    been issued a permit that is (i) not of record with the 21    Department on the effective date of this amendatory Act of 22    the 104th General Assembly, or (ii) a permittee on record 23    with the Department but who has failed to make payments of 24    the assessments as required under Section 19.7 of this Act 25    at any time in the preceding 5 years of the application, 26    the permittee or applicant shall execute, as principal,   SB3113 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 19645 BAB 33094 b1    and file with the Department a bond, executed by a surety 2    authorized to transact business in this State, in an 3    amount estimated to cover the cost of plugging the well 4    and restoring the well site and shall set at the following 5    rates: 6            (A) $10,000 for one well;7            (B) $25,000 in total covering a blanket bond for 8        up to 10 wells;9            (C) $50,000 in total covering a blanket bond for 10        up to 50 wells; or11            (D) $100,000 in total covering a blanket bond for 12        up to 100 wells.13        A blanket bond covering more than 100 wells shall be 14    increased to include the bond amount, as provided in this 15    paragraph (2.5), for the total number of wells more than 16    100 that are covered by the blanket bond. Such bond shall 17    be submitted to the Department before drilling, deepening, 18    converting, or operating any well for which a new or 19    transfer permit is required and that has not previously 20    been plugged and abandoned in accordance with the Act. The 21    Department shall release the bond if any of the following 22    are met:23            (i) all wells covered by the bond are plugged and 24        all well sites are restored in accordance with this 25        Act and administrative rules;26            (ii) all wells covered by the bond are transferred   SB3113 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 19645 BAB 33094 b1        in accordance with this Act and administrative rules; 2        or 3            (iii) the permittee pays assessments to the 4        Department in accordance with Section 19.7 of this Act 5        for 5 consecutive years from the date of issuance of a 6        permit after the effective date of this amendatory Act 7        of the 104th General Assembly and the permittee is not 8        in violation of this Act or any administrative rules.9        In lieu of a surety bond, the applicant may provide 10    certificates of deposit or irrevocable letters of credit 11    under such terms and conditions as the Department may 12    provide by rule.13        The sureties on all bonds in effect on this amendatory 14    Act of the 104th General Assembly shall remain liable as 15    sureties in accordance with their undertakings until 16    released by the Department from further liability under 17    the Act. The principal on each bond in effect on the 18    effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 19    Assembly shall be released from the obligation of 20    maintaining the bond if the well covered by a surety bond 21    has been plugged and the well site restored in accordance 22    with the Department's rules or the principal of the surety 23    has paid the initial assessment in accordance with Section 24    19.7 and no well or well site covered by the surety bond is 25    in violation of the Act.26        No permit shall be issued to a corporation   SB3113 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 19645 BAB 33094 b1    incorporated outside of Illinois until the corporation has 2    been authorized to do business in Illinois.3        No permit shall be issued to an individual, 4    partnership, or other unincorporated entity that is not a 5    resident of Illinois until that individual, partnership, 6    or other unincorporated entity has irrevocably consented 7    to be sued in Illinois.8        (3) To require the person assigning, transferring, or 9    selling any well for which a permit is required under this 10    Act to notify the Department of the change of ownership. 11    The notification shall be on a form prescribed by the 12    Department, shall be executed by the current permittee and 13    by the new permittee, or their authorized representatives, 14    and shall be filed with the Department within 30 days 15    after the effective date of the assignment, transfer or 16    sale. Within the 30-day 30 day notification period and 17    prior to operating the well, the new permittee shall pay 18    the required well transfer fee and, where applicable, file 19    with the Department the bond required under subsection 20    (2.5) of this Section.21        (4) To require the filing with the State Geological 22    Survey of all geophysical logs, a well drilling report and 23    drill cuttings or cores, if cores are required, within 90 24    days after drilling ceases; and to file a completion 25    report with the Department within 30 days after the date 26    of first production following initial drilling or any   SB3113 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 19645 BAB 33094 b1    reworking, or after the plugging of the well, if a dry 2    hole. A copy of each completion report submitted to the 3    Department shall be delivered to the State Geological 4    Survey. The Department and the State Geological Survey 5    shall keep the reports confidential, if requested in 6    writing by the permittee, for 2 years after the date the 7    permit is issued by the Department. This confidentiality 8    requirement shall not prohibit the use of the report for 9    research purposes, provided the State Geological Survey 10    does not publish specific data or identify the well to 11    which the completion report pertains.12        (5) To prevent "blowouts", "caving" and "seepage" in 13    the same sense that conditions indicated by such terms are 14    generally understood in the oil and gas business.15        (6) To prevent fires.16        (7) To ascertain and identify the ownership of all oil 17    and gas wells, producing leases, refineries, tanks, 18    plants, structures, and all storage and transportation 19    equipment and facilities.20        (8) To regulate the use of any enhanced recovery 21    method in oil pools and oil fields.22        (9) To regulate or prohibit the use of vacuum, 23    including charging a vacuum permit application fee of up 24    to $300 per permit.25        (10) To regulate the spacing of wells, the issuance of 26    permits, and the establishment of drilling units.  SB3113 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 19645 BAB 33094 b1        (11) To regulate directional drilling of oil or gas 2    wells.3        (12) To regulate the plugging of wells.4        (13) To require that wells for which no logs or 5    unsatisfactory logs are supplied shall be completely 6    plugged with cement from bottom to top.7        (14) To require a description in such form as is 8    determined by the Department of the method of well 9    plugging for each well, indicating the character of 10    material used and the positions and dimensions of each 11    plug.12        (15) To prohibit waste, as defined in this Act.13        (16) To require the keeping of such records, the 14    furnishing of such relevant information and the 15    performance of such tests as the Department may deem 16    necessary to carry into effect the purposes of this Act.17        (17) To regulate the disposal of salt or 18    sulphur-bearing water and any oil field waste produced in 19    the operation of any oil or gas well.20        (18) To prescribe rules, conduct inspections and 21    require compliance with health and safety standards for 22    the protection of persons working underground in 23    connection with any oil and gas operations. For the 24    purposes of this paragraph, oil and gas operations include 25    drilling or excavation, production operations, plugging or 26    filling in and sealing, or any other work requiring the   SB3113 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 19645 BAB 33094 b1    presence of workers in shafts or excavations beneath the 2    surface of the earth. Rules promulgated by the Department 3    may include minimum qualifications of persons performing 4    tasks affecting the health and safety of workers 5    underground, minimum standards for the operation and 6    maintenance of equipment, and safety procedures and 7    precautions, and shall conform, as nearly as practicable, 8    to corresponding qualifications, standards and procedures 9    prescribed under the Coal Mining Act.10        (19) To deposit the amount of any forfeited surety 11    bond or other security in the Plugging and Restoration 12    Fund, a special fund in the State treasury which is hereby 13    created; to deposit into the Fund any amounts collected, 14    reimbursed or recovered by the Department under Sections 15    19.5, 19.6 and 19.7 of this Act; to accept, receive, and 16    deposit into the Fund any grants, gifts or other funds 17    which may be made available from public or private sources 18    and all earnings received from investment of monies in the 19    Fund; and to make expenditures from the Fund for the 20    purposes of plugging, replugging or repairing any well, 21    and restoring the site of any well, determined by the 22    Department to be abandoned or ordered by the Department to 23    be plugged, replugged, repaired or restored under Sections 24    8a, 19 or 19.1 of this Act, including expenses in 25    administering the Fund.26    For the purposes of this Act, the State Geological Survey   SB3113 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 19645 BAB 33094 b1shall co-operate with the Department in making available its 2scientific and technical information on the oil and gas 3resources of the State, and the Department shall in turn 4furnish a copy to the State Geological Survey of all drilling 5permits as issued, and such other drilling and operating data 6received or secured by the Department which are pertinent to 7scientific research on the State's mineral resources.8(Source: P.A. 104-150, eff. 1-1-26.) 9    (225 ILCS 725/8a)  (from Ch. 96 1/2, par. 5413)10    Sec. 8a. When an inspector or other authorized employee or 11agent of the Department determines that any permittee, or any 12person engaged in conduct or activities required to be 13permitted under this Act, is in violation of any requirement 14of this Act or the rules adopted hereunder or any permit 15condition, or has falsified or otherwise misstated any 16information on or relative to any application, permit, 17required record, or other document required to be submitted to 18the Department by this Act or any rules or procedures adopted 19under this Act, a notice of violation shall be completed and 20delivered to the Director or his designee.21    The notice shall contain:22        1. the nature of the violation;23        2. the action needed to abate the violation, including 24    any appropriate remedial measures to prevent future 25    violation such as replacement, repair, testing and   SB3113 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 19645 BAB 33094 b1    reworking a well and any appurtenances and equipment;2        3. the time within which the violation is to be 3    abated; and4        4. any factors known to the person completing the 5    notice of violation in aggravation or mitigation and the 6    existence of any factors indicating that the permit should 7    be conditioned or modified.8    Upon receipt of a notice of violation, the Director shall 9conduct his investigation and may affirm, vacate or modify the 10notice of violation. In determining whether to take actions in 11addition to remedial action necessary to abate a violation, 12the Director shall consider the person's or permittee's 13history of previous violations including violations at other 14locations and under other permits, the seriousness of the 15violation including any irreparable harm to the environment or 16damage to property, the degree of culpability of the person or 17permittee and the existence of any additional conditions or 18factors in aggravation or mitigation including information 19provided by the person or permittee.20    The Director shall serve the person or permittee with his 21decision at the conclusion of the investigation. Modification 22of the notice of violation may include:23        1. any different or additional remedial action 24    required to abate the violation and the time within which 25    the violation must be abated;26        2. the assessment of civil penalties not to exceed   SB3113 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 19645 BAB 33094 b1    $5,000 for each and every falsification or misstatement of 2    information and civil penalties not to exceed $4,000 per 3    and $1,000 a day for each and every act of violation not 4    including a falsification or misstatement of information;5        3. probationary or permanent modification or 6    conditions on the permit which may include special 7    monitoring or reporting requirements; and8        4. revocation of the permit.9    The Director's decision shall provide that the person or 10permittee has the right to request a hearing.11    The Director's decision affirming, vacating or modifying 12the notice of violation shall be considered served when mailed 13by first class mail to the person or permittee at his last 14known address.15    A person or permittee shall have 30 days from the date of 16service of the Director's decision to request a hearing. If 17the Director's decision includes the assessment of a civil 18penalty, the person or permittee charged with the penalty 19shall pay the penalty in full or, if the person or permittee 20wishes to contest either the amount of the penalty or the fact 21of the violation, submit the assessed amount, with the request 22for a hearing, to be held in escrow. The filing of a request 23for a hearing shall not operate as a stay of the Director's 24decision. All civil penalties finally assessed and paid to the 25Department shall be deposited in the Underground Resources 26Conservation Enforcement Fund.  SB3113 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 19645 BAB 33094 b1    Any person who willfully or knowingly authorized, ordered, 2or carried out any violation cited in the Director's decision 3shall be subject to the same actions, including civil 4penalties, which may be imposed on the person or permittee 5under this Section.6    Upon receipt of a request, the Department shall provide an 7opportunity for a formal hearing upon not less than 5 days 8notice. The hearing shall be conducted by the Director or 9anyone designated by him for such purpose, and shall be 10located and conducted in accordance with the rules of the 11Department. Failure of the person or permittee to timely 12request a hearing or, if a civil penalty has been assessed, to 13timely tender the assessed civil penalty, shall constitute a 14waiver of all legal rights to contest the Director's decision, 15including the amount of any civil penalty. Within 30 days of 16the close of the hearing record or expiration of the time to 17request a hearing, the Department shall issue a final 18administrative order.19    If, at the expiration of the period of time originally 20fixed in the Director's decision or in any subsequent 21extension of time granted by the Department, the Department 22finds that the violation has not been abated, it may 23immediately order the cessation of operations or the portions 24thereof relevant to the violation. Such cessation order shall 25be served in the manner and within the time prescribed in 26Section 19.1 of this Act.  SB3113 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 19645 BAB 33094 b1    Pending the holding of any hearing or entry of a final 2administrative order under this Section, the person or 3permittee to whom the cessation order was issued may file a 4written request for temporary relief subject to the same terms 5and conditions as are provided for in Section 19.1 of this Act.6    If the Department finds that a person or permittee has 7failed to comply with a final administrative order, the 8Department may immediately order the cessation of operations 9or the portions thereof relevant to the final administrative 10order. Such cessation order shall be served in the manner and 11within the time prescribed in Section 19.1 of this Act. The 12Department shall commence a hearing within 5 days after 13issuance of a cessation order and shall conclude such hearing 14without appreciable delay. At the hearing the Department shall 15have the burden of proving that the person or permittee has not 16complied with the final administrative order. A cessation 17order issued under this paragraph shall continue in effect 18until modified, vacated, or terminated by the Department.19    The Department shall refuse to issue a permit or permits, 20and shall revoke any permit or permits previously issued if:21        (1) the applicant has falsified or otherwise misstated 22    any information on or relative to the permit application;23        (2) the applicant has failed to abate a violation of 24    the Act specified in a final administrative decision of 25    the Department;26        (3) an officer, director, partner, or person with an   SB3113 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 19645 BAB 33094 b1    interest in the applicant exceeding 5% failed to abate a 2    violation of the Act specified in a final administrative 3    decision of the Department; or4        (4) the applicant is an officer, director, partner, or 5    person with an interest exceeding 5% in another entity 6    that has failed to abate a violation of the Act specified 7    in a final administrative decision of the Department.8(Source: P.A. 99-137, eff. 1-1-16.) 9    (225 ILCS 725/8e)10    Sec. 8e. Temporary abandonment status fees. 11    (a) The Department shall assess and collect annual fees of 12$100 per well for each well that is in temporary abandonment 13status.14    (b) All annual fees collected pursuant to subsection (a) 15shall be deposited into the Plugging and Restoration Fund, and 16one-half of all such deposited fees shall be used solely for 17the Landowner Grant Program. deposited as follows: (1) 18one-half of all such fees shall be placed in the Plugging and 19Restoration Fund; and (2) one-half of all such fees shall be 20placed in the Landowner Grant Program.21(Source: P.A. 102-1017, eff. 1-1-23.) 22    (225 ILCS 725/14)  (from Ch. 96 1/2, par. 5420)23    Sec. 14. Each application for a permit to drill, deepen, 24convert, or amend shall be accompanied by the required fee of   SB3113 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 19645 BAB 33094 b1$400. The fee for an application for a permit to oil lease road 2shall be $150. A fee of $75 for the first 100 wells and $50 for 3each well in excess of 100 shall be paid by the new owner for 4each transfer of well ownership. Except for the assessments 5required to be deposited in the Plugging and Restoration Fund 6under Section 19.7 of this Act and any other deposits required 7to be deposited in the Plugging and Restoration Fund under 8this Act, all fees assessed and collected under this Act shall 9be deposited in the Underground Resources Conservation 10Enforcement Fund. The moneys monies deposited into the 11Plugging and Restoration Fund or the Underground Resources 12Conservation Enforcement Fund under this Section or deposited 13into the Plugging and Restoration Fund under Section 26 shall 14not be subject to administrative charges or chargebacks unless 15otherwise authorized by this Act. 16    On and after July 1, 2022, any fees that are created by or 17increased by this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly 18in this Section shall be deposited into the Plugging and 19Restoration Fund. 20(Source: P.A. 102-1017, eff. 1-1-23.) 21    (225 ILCS 725/26)  (from Ch. 96 1/2, par. 5456)22    Sec. 26. (a) Any person who violates any provision of this 23Act or any valid rule, regulation, permit or order of the 24Department made hereunder, or who repeats or continues the 25violation thereof, shall be subject to a civil penalty not to   SB3113 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 19645 BAB 33094 b1exceed: 2        (1) $1,000 a day for each and every act of violation 3    lasting 90 days or less.4        (2) $2,000 a day for any violation lasting more than 5    90 days but less than 180 days.6        (3) $4,000 a day for any violation lasting 180 days or 7    more.8    Any civil penalties that are assessed in excess of $1,000 9per day shall be deposited into the Plugging and Restoration 10Fund.11    Civil penalties may not be assessed until notice has been 12sent to the permittee. Such notice may be sent electronically 13at the time the notice of violation is sent to the Springfield 14office of the Department.15    A permittee may notify the Department if an extraordinary 16circumstance prevents abatement of a violation for which civil 17penalties are sought to be assessed against the permittee. If 18the permittee notifies the Department, the permittee shall 19then provide evidence of the extraordinary circumstance to the 20Department, as set forth by rule. The assessment of a civil 21penalty shall not begin until the extraordinary circumstance 22terminates, as set forth by rule. The process to declare an 23extraordinary circumstance, the Department's review and 24approval of the extraordinary circumstance, and any appeal of 25the Department's determination shall be set by rule. An 26extraordinary circumstance shall include, but not be limited   SB3113 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 19645 BAB 33094 b1to, roads being posted with a weight limit that prevents the 2movement of equipment, wet field conditions that prevent 3mitigation activities, or flooding that prevents the movement 4of equipment for the abatement. 5    (b) Any person willfully wilfully aiding or abetting any 6other person in the violation of any provision of this Act, or 7any rule, regulation and order made hereunder, shall be 8subject to the same penalties as are prescribed herein for the 9violation by such other person.10(Source: P.A. 85-1334.)